Utah statutes.
11-36a-306.   Certification of impact fee analysis.

(1)  An impact fee facilities plan shall include a written certification from the person or entity that prepares the impact fee facilities plan that states the following:

"I certify that the attached impact fee facilities plan:

1.  includes only the costs of public facilities that are:

a.  allowed under the Impact Fees Act; and

b.  actually incurred; or

c.  projected to be incurred or encumbered within six years after the day on which each impact fee is paid;

2.  does not include:

a.  costs of operation and maintenance of public facilities;

b.  costs for qualifying public facilities that will raise the level of service for the facilities, through impact fees, above the level of service that is supported by existing residents; or

c.  an expense for overhead, unless the expense is calculated pursuant to a methodology that is consistent with generally accepted cost accounting practices and the methodological standards set forth by the federal Office of Management and Budget for federal grant reimbursement; and

3.  complies in each and every relevant respect with the Impact Fees Act."

(2)  An impact fee analysis shall include a written certification from the person or entity that prepares the impact fee analysis which states as follows:

"I certify that the attached impact fee analysis:

1.  includes only the costs of public facilities that are:

a.  allowed under the Impact Fees Act; and

b.  actually incurred; or

c.  projected to be incurred or encumbered within six years after the day on which each impact fee is paid;

2.  does not include:

a.  costs of operation and maintenance of public facilities;

b.  costs for qualifying public facilities that will raise the level of service for the facilities, through impact fees, above the level of service that is supported by existing residents; or

c.  an expense for overhead, unless the expense is calculated pursuant to a methodology that is consistent with generally accepted cost accounting practices and the methodological standards set forth by the federal Office of Management and Budget for federal grant reimbursement;

3.  offsets costs with grants or other alternate sources of payment; and

4.  complies in each and every relevant respect with the Impact Fees Act."



Amended by Chapter 278, 2013 General Session

